Louisiana, session 2026, HB770.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:428(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§428. Commencement and duration of lease; renewal; fixing of rental rates
A. All leases made under the provisions of this Subpart shall begin on the
day the lease is signed and continue for a period of fifteen five years. The owners
of expiring leases have first right of renewal of their leases. However, this right to
renewal shall be subject to the provisions of this Subpart. Leases carry the first right
of renewal for successive periods of fifteen five years each, provided the lease is
capable of supporting oyster populations. Renewals shall be executed by the
secretary and shall be made subject to both the provisions of this Subpart and to the
rules and regulations established by the department.
B. The secretary has sixty days from the date of expiration of a lease to
execute a renewal lease. If a renewal lease is not executed within this sixty-day
period, the lease is automatically renewed. In either situation, the fifteen-year five-
year period of the renewal lease shall begin on the first day following the expiration
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1185 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 770
date of the prior lease, and the renewal lease shall be assigned the same number used
for the prior lease with the addition of a designation to indicate which year the lease
was renewed. If a leaseholder wishes to change the configuration of his lease in
accordance with the department's rules governing leased areas, a resurvey and plan
of the water bottom shall be made by the leaseholder in accordance with the
standards required by the department and a copy supplied to the department. The
department may resurvey any lease for potential conflicts with department rules and
regulations. If the department determines that a resurvey will be conducted, the
leaseholder shall be given ten days written notice of the scheduled resurvey by the
department and may be present at the resurvey.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall apply prospectively only to new leases and lease renewals
executed or automatically renewed after the effective date of this Act.